src/fst/phonetics/txt2ipa.xfscript
! Svakt stadium (her må vi liste konsonantpara)
!Only the pairs with different phonological and orthographic representation
define WeakGrade           l b %^ b   -> l p %^ p   ,
                           l d %^ d   -> l t %^ t   ,
                           l g %^ g   -> l k %^ k   ,
                         l h k %^ k   -> l L %^ k   ,
                         l h p %^ p   -> l L %^ p   ,
                           l n %^ n j -> l ɲ %^ ɲ   ,
                         l h t %^ t   -> l L %^ t   ,
                         l h c %^ c   -> l L %^ t s ,
                         l h č %^ č   -> l L %^ t š ,
                           l z %^ z   -> l t %^ t s ,
                           l ž %^ ž   -> l t %^ t š ,

                           j b %^ b   -> j p %^ p   ,
                           j g %^ g   -> j k %^ k   ,
                         j h n %^ n   -> j N %^ N   ,
                         j h k %^ k   -> j J %^ k   ,
                         j h p %^ p   -> j J %^ p   ,
                         j h m %^ m   -> j M %^ M   ,
                         j h l %^ l   -> j L %^ L   ,
                         j h t %^ t   -> j J %^ t   ,
                         j h c %^ c   -> j J %^ t s ,
                           j z %^ z   -> j t %^ t s ,
                           j d %^ d   -> j t %^ t   ,
                         j s k %^ k   -> j s %^ k   ,
                         j s t %^ t   -> j s %^ t   ,

                           r b %^ b   -> r p %^ p   ,
                           r d %^ d   -> r t %^ t   ,
                           r g %^ g   -> r k %^ k   ,
                         r h p %^ p   -> r R %^ p   ,

                         r h k %^ k   -> r R %^ k   ,
                         r h t %^ t   -> r R %^ t   ,
                         r h c %^ c   -> r R %^ t s ,
                         r h č %^ č   -> r R %^ t š ,
                         r s t %^ t   -> r s %^ t   ,
                         r s k %^ k   -> r s %^ k   ,

                           r z %^ z   -> r t %^ t s ,
                           r ž %^ ž   -> r t %^ t š ,

                           m b %^ b   -> m p %^ p   ,
                           n d %^ d   -> n t %^ t   ,
                           n g %^ g   -> ŋ k %^ k   ,
                         m h p %^ p   -> m M %^ p   ,
                         m š k %^ k   -> m š %^ k   ,

                         n h k %^ k   -> ŋ Ŋ %^ k   ,
                         ŋ h k %^ k   -> ŋ Ŋ %^ k   ,
                         n h t %^ t   -> n N %^ t   ,
                         n h c %^ c   -> n N %^ t s ,
                         n h č %^ č   -> n N %^ t š ,
                         n s t %^ t   -> n s %^ t   ,
                         n s k %^ k   -> n s %^ k   ,

                           n z %^ z   -> n t %^ t s ,
                           n ž %^ ž   -> n t %^ t š ,

                           đ b %^ b   -> đ p %^ p   ,
                           đ g %^ g   -> đ k %^ k   ,

                           v n %^ n   -> w n %^ n   ,
                           v d %^ d   -> w t %^ t   ,
                           v g %^ g   -> w k %^ k   ,
                           v j %^ j   -> w j %^ j   ,
                           v l %^ l   -> w l %^ l   ,
                         v h l %^ l   -> w L %^ L   ,
                           v r %^ r   -> w r %^ r   ,
                           v z %^ z   -> w t %^ t s ,
                           v ž %^ ž   -> w t %^ t š ,
                           v š %^ š   -> w š %^ š   ,
                           v s %^ s   -> w s %^ s   ,
                           v n %^ n j -> w ɲ %^ ɲ   ,
                         v s k %^ k   -> w s %^ k   ,
                         v s t %^ t   -> w s %^ t   ,
                         v h t %^ t   -> w W %^ t   ,
                         v h k %^ k   -> w W %^ k   ,
                         v h p %^ p   -> w W %^ p   ,
                         v h c %^ c   -> w W %^ t s ,
                         v h č %^ č   -> w W %^ t š

                   || [.#.| %- | %# ] (Syll Syll) Cns* Vow+ _ Vow ;



define HighVowelLenghtening i -> i i , u -> u u || .#. Syll (Cns) Cns* _ ( [Cns - j] ) .#. ;


define StrongNasalClusters m %^ p   -> m m %^ M p   ,
                           m %^ š k -> m m %^ š k   ,
                           n %^ t   -> n n %^ N t   ,
                           n %^ k   -> ŋ ŋ %^ Ŋ k   ,
                           n %^ c   -> n n %^ N t s ,
                           n %^ s k -> n n %^ s k   ,
                           n %^ s t -> n n %^ s t   ,
                           n %^ č   -> n n %^ N t š 
                           || Vow _ Vow ;

! Allegro former... Hva gjør vi med dem?
! Viss det er former som berre er allegro i visse delar av setninga, men ikkje
! elles, må vi ta dei som del av syntaksen på noko vis.
! Viss dei er allegro i samansetjingar må vi gå til leksikon



define VzzRule z %^ z -> d d %^ t s , 
               ž %^ ž -> d d %^ t š , 
               b %^ b -> b b %^ p   , 
               d %^ d -> d d %^ t   , 
               g %^ g -> g g %^ k   || Vow _ Vow ;
define zzRule  z %^ z ->   t %^ t s , 
               ž %^ ž ->   t %^ t š ,
               b %^ b ->   p %^ p   , 
               d %^ d ->   t %^ t   , 
               g %^ g ->   k %^ k   || Cns _ Vow ;
             ! Bled by previous

define bdgRule b -> p   , d -> t   , g -> k   || [.#.|%#|%-] _ Vow ;
define ptkRule p -> p h , t -> t h , k -> k h || [.#.|%#|%-] _ Vow ;

define VzRule   z              -> d s        , 
                ž              -> d š        || Vow %^ _ Vow ;
define CttjRule č %^ č         -> h %^ t š   , 
                c %^ c         -> h %^ t s   ,
                t š %^ t š     -> h %^ t š   , 
                t s %^ t s     -> h %^ t s 
                                             || Vow Cns (h)  _ ;
define ttjRule  č %^ č         -> t %^ t š   , 
                c %^ c         -> t %^ t s   || Vow _ ;
define cRule    c              -> t s , 
                č              -> t š ;

!gávc^ci (line 367 ka:vht.tsi: -> ka:vh.tsi:
! no får vi: kɑɑvhts.tsii
!utan cRule: kɑːvhc.ciː 

define VowelLengthening e -> e e ,
                        i -> i i ,
                        o -> o o ,
                        u -> u u 
                             || .#. (Cns*) _ (h) %^ Cns Vow [Cns | .#. ] ;

define VowelShortening á -> a || _ h h ; ! this should be generalised.
                                         !from aahhtšii to ahhtšii

define DiphthongShorteningIIIGr  i -> ĭ ,
                                 e -> ĕ ,
                                 u -> ŭ ,
                                 o -> ŏ 
                                        || _ [e|a|o] 
                                             [ [ h h
                                               | m m
                                               | n n
                                               | ŋ ŋ
                                               | đ đ
                                               | ɟ ɟ
                                               | l l
                                               | ʎ ʎ
                                               | s s
                                               | š š
                                               | j j
                                               | v v
                                               | Cns ə ] %^ ] ;

define DiphthongShorteningSecLng  i e -> ĭ ĕ ,
                                  e a -> ĕ ă ,
                                  u o -> ŭ ŏ ,
                                  o a -> ŏ ă 
                                             || _ Cns* %^SL ;

define DiphthongShorteningAllegro  i e -> ĭ e ,
                                   e a -> ĕ a ,
                                   u o -> ŭ o ,
                                   o a -> ŏ a 
                                              || _ Cns* %^ Cns* [e|o] ;
echo << Dialectal rules >>

!define dhRule đ -> r ; ! Moving from Karesuando to Kautokeino
!define thRule ŧ -> s ;

define eaRule a -> ä || [e|ĕ] _ ;

define aaRule á -> a a ;

define PronounLenghtening u -> u u || .#. [m|t|s] _ .#. ;


echo << And now we go for some OUTPUTFORMAT or another >>

! The rules above are somewhat oriented towards the orthography, and rearrange
! based upon that. Now, we might want to have output in different formats for 
! different reasons:
! SAMPA   = for the Helsinki tts engine
! IPA     = so that we may read it during development
! FINNISH = to target the fallback Bitlips demo if we are not able to meet the
!           October deadline with the generated Sámi voice.

!The idea is to comment out two of the following three rules and keep the one intended.


! ... here outputformat is SAMPA:              
!define OUTPUTFORMAT ə -> %@ , ä -> %{ , æ -> %{ , ö -> 2 , ø -> 2 , a -> A , 
!                  n j -> J , ŋ -> N , š -> S , đ -> D ,  ŧ -> T , ɟ -> J \ , 
!                    L -> l %_ %0 , R -> r %_ %0 , M -> m %_ %0 , N -> n %_ %0 , 
!                    Ŋ -> N %_ %0 , V -> v %_ %0 ,
!                   %^ -> %. ;
! note potential problems with J\.

! ... here outputformat is IPA:              
 define OUTPUTFORMAT a -> ɑ ,
                     ç -> s ,
                     đ -> ð ,
                     é -> e e ,
                     í -> i i ,
                   n j -> ɲ ,
                     ò -> o ,
                     ó -> u u ,
                     q -> k ,
                     š -> ʃ ,
                     ŧ -> θ ,
                     þ -> θ ,
                     ü -> y ,
                     x -> k s ,
                     å -> o o ,
                     ä -> æ ,
                     ö -> ø ,
                     w -> β ,
                     W -> ɸ ,
                     L -> l̥ ,
                     R -> r̥ ,
                     M -> m̥ ,
                     N -> n̥ ,
                     Ŋ -> ŋ̊ ,
                     V -> v̥ ,
                     J -> ç , 
                    %^ -> %. ;


define OUTPUTFORMAT2   h -> ʰ || [.#.|%#|%-] [p|t|k] _ Vow ; ! for rules with context...



! ... here outputformat is FUPA:
! define OUTPUTFORMAT a -> ɑ , n j -> ń , đ -> ð ,
!                                          
!                     %^ -> %. ;

define COLONLENGTH   ɑ ɑ -> ɑ ː , e e -> e ː , i i -> i ː , o o -> o ː , u u -> u ː ,
                     b b -> b ː , β β -> β ː , ɸ ɸ -> ɸ ː , ɟ ɟ -> ɟ ː , c c -> c ː , 
                     d d -> d ː , ð ð -> ð ː , f f -> f ː , g g -> g ː , 
                     h h -> h ː , j j -> j ː , k k -> k ː , l l -> l ː , ʎ ʎ -> ʎ ː ,
                     m m -> m ː , n n -> n ː , ɲ ɲ -> ɲ ː , p p -> p ː , r r -> r ː , 
                     s s -> s ː , t t -> t ː , ʃ ʃ -> ʃ ː , v v -> v ː ,
                     l̥ l̥ -> l̥ ː , r̥ r̥ -> r̥ ː , m̥ m̥ -> m̥ ː , n̥ n̥ -> n̥ ː , 
                     ŋ̊ ŋ̊ -> ŋ̊ ː , v̥ v̥ -> v̥ ː , 
                     t ʃ  t ʃ -> t ʃ ː ;

! TT: The last line above is my temporary fix for čč =  t ʃ  t ʃ . TODO: fix

! Then the same with a syllable mark in between (only consonants):
define COLONLENGTHSYLL b %. b -> %. b ː , β %. β -> %. β ː , ɸ %. ɸ -> %. ɸ ː ,
                       ɟ %. ɟ -> %. ɟ ː , c %. c -> %. c ː , d %. d -> %. d ː ,
                       ð %. ð -> %. ð ː , f %. f -> %. f ː , g %. g -> %. g ː , 
                       h %. h -> %. h ː , j %. j -> %. j ː , k %. k -> %. k ː ,
                       l %. l -> %. l ː , ʎ %. ʎ -> %. ʎ ː , m %. m -> %. m ː ,
                       n %. n -> %. n ː , ɲ %. ɲ -> %. ɲ ː , p %. p -> %. p ː ,
                       r %. r -> %. r ː , s %. s -> %. s ː , t %. t -> %. t ː ,
                       ʃ %. ʃ -> %. ʃ ː , v %. v -> %. v ː , l̥ %. l̥ -> %. l̥ ː ,
                       r̥ %. r̥ -> %. r̥ ː , m̥ %. m̥ -> %. m̥ ː , n̥ %. n̥ -> %. n̥ ː , 
                       ŋ̊ %. ŋ̊ -> %. ŋ̊ ː , v̥ %. v̥ -> %. v̥ ː 
                       ;
